Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.540

Provision of drugs to ambulance or aid services associated with providing emergency medical services to patients.

A pharmacy that is licensed under this chapter and operated by a hospital that is licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW may provide drugs to ambulance or aid services that are licensed under RCW 18.73.130 for use associated with providing emergency medical services to patients if the following conditions are met:

(1) The hospital is located in the same or an adjacent county to the county in which the ambulance or aid service operates;

(2) A medical program director of an ambulance or aid service has requested drugs from the hospital per agreed protocol. A medical program director may only request drugs that:

(a) Are relevant to the level of service provided by the ambulance or aid service and the training of its emergency medical personnel; and

(b) Are approved as part of the ambulance or aid service prehospital patient care protocols for use by emergency medical personnel in the county in which the ambulance or aid service is located; and

(3) The provision of the drugs by the pharmacy is not contingent upon arrangements for the transport of patients to the hospital that operates the pharmacy for reasons other than the consideration of patients' medical needs and any patient care procedures.

[ 2015 c 255 s 1.]